da: Pagajform: Novelty; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Kvadratisk; Anden
fr: Forme de la pagaie: Fantaisie; Ovale; Rectangle; Ronde; Carrée; Autre
zh-TW: 槳片形狀: 新奇造型; 橢圓形; 長方形; 圓形; 正方形; 其他
pt-PT: Forma da raquete: Fantasia; Oval; Retângulo; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
nb: Padleåreform: Gøyal; Oval; Rektangel; Rund; Kvadrat; Annet
hu: Evezőlapát alakja: Különleges; Ovális; Téglalap; Kerek; Négyzet; Egyéb
fi: Melan muoto: Erikoismuoto; Ovaali; Suorakulmio; Pyöreä; Neliö; Muu
pt-BR: Remo, formato: Diferenciado; Oval; Retângulo; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
ru: Форма весла: Оригинальная; Овальная; Прямоугольная; Круглая; Квадратная; Другое
en: Paddle shape: Novelty; Oval; Rectangle; Round; Square; Other
it: Forma della pagaia: Particolare; Ovale; Rettangolo; Rotondo; Quadrato; Altro
sl-SI: Oblika lopatice: Posebne oblike (novelty); Ovalno; Pravokotnik; Okroglo; Kvadrat; Drugo
de: Paddelform: Sonderform; Oval; Rechteckig; Rund; Quadratisch; Sonstige
sk-SK: Tvar pádla: Netradičný; Oválny; Obdĺžnik; Okrúhly; Štvorec; Iné
el: Σχήμα κουπιού: Πρωτότυπο σχέδιο; Οβάλ; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Raketės forma: Originalus; Ovalus; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Kvadratas; Kita
ja: パドル形状: ノベルティ; 楕円; 長方形; ラウンド; スクエア; その他
nl: Paddlevorm: Novelty; Ovaal; Rechthoek; Rond; Vierkant; Overig
th: รูปทรงของไม้พาย: รูปทรงแปลกใหม่; วงรี; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; กลม; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Форма на греблото: Нестандартна форма; Овална; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Квадратна; Друго
cs: Tvar pádla: Neobvyklý tvar; Oválný; Obdélníkový; Kulatý; Čtvercový; Jiné
sv: Form på paddel: Specialform; Oval; Rektangel; Rund; Fyrkantig; Övrigt
pl: Kształt wiosła: Niestandardowy; Owalny; Prostokątny; Okrągły; Kwadratowy; Inne
zh-CN: 球拍形状: 新奇形; 椭圆形; 长方形; 圆形; 正方形; 其他
ko: 패들 모양: 노블티형; 타원형; 직사각형; 원형; 정사각형; 기타
vi: Hình dạng vợt pickleball: Độc lạ; Bầu dục; Chữ nhật; Tròn; Vuông; Khác
tr: Kürek şekli: Özgün; Oval; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kare; Diğer
es: Forma de la pala: Novedad; Ovalado; Rectángulo; Redondo; Cuadrado; Otro
ro-RO: Formă a padelei: Noutate; Oval; Dreptunghi; Rotund; Pătrat; Altele
hr-HR: Oblik vesla: Novitet; Ovalan; Pravokutan; Okrugao; Kvadratan; Ostalo